Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4010 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall expand Medicaid
eligibility to adults nineteen (19) to sixty-four (64) years of age
whose income is one hundred sixty percent (160%) of the federal
poverty level.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11169 TJ 12/20/24


Req. No. 11169 Page 1